Washington statutes.
RCW 9.98.040

Court not prohibited from ordering prisoner to trial.

This chapter shall not be construed as preempting the right of the superior court on the motion of the county prosecuting attorney from ordering the superintendent of a state penal or correctional institution to cause a prisoner to be transported to the superior court of the county for trial upon any untried indictment, information or complaint.

[ 1959 c 56 s 4.]